Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 1A. Restitution

§ 40-14-616.
Enforcement.

The administrator, in carrying out enforcement activities under this section, in cases where an annual percentage rate or finance charge was inaccurately disclosed, shall notify the creditor of the disclosure error and is authorized, in accordance with this section, to require the creditor to make an adjustment to the account of the person to whom credit was extended, to assure that the person will not be required to pay a finance charge in excess of the finance charge actually disclosed or the dollar equivalent of the annual percentage rate actually disclosed, whichever is lower. For the purposes of this section, except where the disclosure error resulted from a willful violation which was intended to mislead the person to whom credit was extended, in determining whether a disclosure error has occurred and in calculating any adjustment:

The administrator shall apply:

For transactions consummated after January 1, 1977, until March 31, 1982, with respect to the annual percentage rate, a tolerance of one-quarter of one percent (.25%) more or less than the actual rate determined without regard to W.S.

40-14-225

and

40-14-323

, except in the case of an irregular mortgage lending transaction consummated between January 1, 1977, and March 31, 1982, in which a tolerance of one-half of one percent (.5%) is allowed; and

With respect to the finance charge, a corresponding numerical tolerance as generated by the tolerance provided under this section for the annual percentage rate, except that with respect to transactions consummated on or after April 1, 1982 the administrator shall apply:

For transactions that have a scheduled amortization of ten (10) years or less with respect to the annual percentage rate, a tolerance not to exceed one-quarter of one percent (.25%) more or less than the actual rate determined without regard to W.S.

40-14-225

and

40-14-323

;

For transactions that have a scheduled amortization of more than ten (10) years, with respect to the annual percentage rate, only such tolerances as are allowed under W.S. 40-14-225 and 40-14-323; and

For all transactions, with respect to the finance charge, a corresponding numerical tolerance as generated by the tolerances provided under this subsection for the annual percentage rate.

The administrator shall require an adjustment when he determines that the disclosure error resulted from a clear and consistent pattern or practice of violations, gross negligence or a willful violation which was intended to mislead the person to whom the credit was extended. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, except where the disclosure error resulted from a willful violation which was intended to mislead the person to whom credit was extended, the administrator need not require such an adjustment if he determines that the disclosure error:

Resulted from an error involving the disclosure of a fee or charge that would otherwise be excludable in computing the finance charge, including but not limited to violations involving the disclosures described in rules adopted by the administrator in which event the administrator may require such remedial action as he determines to be equitable, except that for transactions consummated on or after April 1, 1982 the adjustment shall be ordered for violations of W.S. 40-14-213(b) and 40-14-311(b);

Involved a disclosed amount which was ten percent (10%) or less of the amount that should have been disclosed and, in cases where the error involved a disclosed finance charge, the annual percentage rate was disclosed correctly, and, in cases where the error involved a disclosed annual percentage rate, the finance charge was disclosed correctly, in which event the administrator may require such adjustment as he determines to be equitable;

Involved a total failure to disclose either the annual percentage rate or the finance charge, in which event the administrator may require any adjustment as he determines to be equitable; or

Resulted from any other unique circumstance involving clearly technical and nonsubstantive disclosure violations that do not adversely affect information provided to the consumer and that have not misled or otherwise deceived the consumer.

In the case of other disclosure errors, the administrator may require such an adjustment.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, no adjustment shall be ordered:

If it would have a significantly adverse impact upon the safety or soundness of the creditor, but, in any such case, the administrator may require a partial adjustment in an amount which does not have such an impact, except that, with respect to any transaction consummated after the effective date of this section, the administrator shall require the full adjustment, but permit the creditor to make the required adjustment in partial payments over an extended period of time which the administrator considers to be reasonable;

If the amount of the adjustment would be less than one dollar ($1.00), except that if more than one (1) year has elapsed since the date of the violation, the administrator may require that the amount shall be paid into the state treasury; or

Except where disclosure error resulted from a willful violation which was intended to mislead the person to whom credit was extended, in the case of an open-end credit plan, more than two (2) years after the violation, or in the case of any other extension of credit, as follows:

With respect to creditors that are subject to examination by the administrator, except in connection with violations arising from practices identified in the current examination and only in connection with transactions that are consummated after the date of the immediately preceding examination, except that where practices giving rise to violations identified in earlier examinations have not been corrected, adjustments for those violations shall be required in connection with transactions consummated after the date of the examination in which the practices were first identified;

With respect to creditors that are not subject to examination by the administrator, except in connection with transactions that are consummated after March 31, 1980; and

In no event after the later of the expiration of the life of the credit extension or two (2) years after the agreement to extend credit was consummated.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an adjustment under this subsection may be required by the administrator only by an order issued in accordance with the rules and regulations of the administrator pursuant to this act.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this subsection and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the administrator may not require a creditor to make dollar adjustments for errors in any requirements under this act except as otherwise specifically provided.

A creditor is not subject to an order to make an adjustment, if, within sixty (60) days after discovering a disclosure error, whether pursuant to a final written examination report or through the creditor’s own procedures, the creditor notifies the person concerned of the error and adjusts the account so as to assure that the person will not be required to pay a finance charge in excess of the finance charge actually disclosed or the dollar equivalent of the annual percentage rate actually disclosed, whichever is lower.

Notwithstanding the second sentence of subsection (a), subparagraph (d)(iii)(A) and subparagraph (d)(iii)(B) of this section, the administrator shall require an adjustment for an annual percentage rate disclosure error that exceeds a tolerance of one-quarter of one percent (.25%) less than the actual rate determined without regard to W.S.

40-14-225

and

40-14-323

, except in the case of an irregular mortgage lending transaction with respect to any transaction consummated between January 1, 1977 and March 31, 1980.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 29, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1982, ch. 29, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 1982.

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (e) and (f), see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “finance charge” under § 106(a) of the Truth in Lending Act (15 USC § 1605(a)) or applicable regulations 154 ALR Fed 431.